Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 4. Probation and Parole Generally
§ 7-13-424.
Medical parole; conditions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law restricting the grant of parole, except for inmates sentenced to death or life imprisonment without parole, the board may grant a medical parole to any inmate meeting the conditions specified in this section. The board shall consider a medical parole upon receipt of written certification by a licensed treating physician that, within a reasonable degree of certainty, one (1) of the following circumstances exist:

The inmate has a serious incapacitating medical need which requires treatment that cannot reasonably be provided while confined in a state correctional facility;

The inmate is incapacitated by age to the extent that deteriorating physical or mental health substantially diminishes the ability of the inmate to provide self-care within the environment of a correctional facility;

The inmate is permanently physically incapacitated as the result of an irreversible injury, disease or illness which makes significant physical activity impossible, renders the inmate dependent on permanent medical intervention for survival or confines the inmate to a bed, wheelchair or other assistive device where his mobility is significantly limited; or

The inmate suffers from a terminal illness caused by injury or disease which is predicted to result in death within twelve (12) months of the application for parole.

The board may only grant a medical parole if it first determines:

That, based on a review of all available information, one (1) or more of the conditions specified in subsection (a) of this section exists;

That the inmate is not likely to abscond or violate the law if released;

That living arrangements are in place in the community and sufficient resources are available to meet the inmate’s living and medical needs and expenses; and

That the inmate does not have a medical condition that would endanger public health, safety or welfare if the inmate were released, or that the inmate’s proposed living arrangements would protect the public health, safety or welfare from any threat of harm the inmate’s medical condition may pose.

Upon the board’s request, an independent medical evaluation by a licensed physician shall be conducted, provided to the board and paid for by the department.

The board shall provide the prosecuting attorney and the sentencing court with prior notice of, and the opportunity to provide input regarding, a medical parole hearing for an inmate who is otherwise ineligible for parole.

The board shall impose terms and conditions of parole as it deems necessary, including but not limited to requiring periodic medical progress reports at intervals of not more than six (6) months, in granting a medical parole. A medical parole may be revoked if the parolee violates a condition of parole or if the medical condition which was the basis for the grant of parole no longer exists or has been ameliorated to the extent that the justification for medical parole no longer exists.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 100, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 100, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.